Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.902

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 244.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1979.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 19.]